Tennessee, session 114, SB0037.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-11-303(a)(33), is amended by
deleting "Annual report 20.00" and substituting "Annual report 300.00".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-51-303(a)(33), is amended by
deleting "Annual report 20.00" and substituting "Annual report 300.00".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-249-1007, is amended by deleting
subsection (d) and substituting:
(d)
(1) The secretary of state shall collect from each domestic LLC and each
foreign LLC that is applying for a certificate of authority or is authorized to
transact business in this state, as applicable, an initial filing fee in an amount
equal to one hundred dollars ($100) and each year thereafter an annual filing fee
in an amount equal to three hundred dollars ($300).
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (d)(1), if an LLC is prohibited by its
articles from transacting business in this state, then the amount of the initial filing
fee or the annual filing fee, as applicable, required under this subsection (d) is
three hundred dollars ($300).
(3) The secretary of state shall collect from each domestic and foreign
LLC an additional filing fee of twenty dollars ($20.00), for any annual report that
sets forth a change of the registered office or registered agent of the domestic or
foreign LLC.
SB0037
000961
- 1 -

SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000961